Utah statutes.
11-2-1.   Local authorities may designate and acquire property for playgrounds and recreational facilities.

The governing body of any city, town, school district, local district, special service district, or county may designate and set apart for use as playgrounds, athletic fields, gymnasiums, public baths, swimming pools, camps, indoor recreation centers, television transmission and relay facilities, or other recreational facilities, any lands, buildings or personal property owned by such cities, towns, counties, local districts, special service districts, or school districts that may be suitable for such purposes; and may, in such manner as may be authorized and provided by law for the acquisition of lands or buildings for public purposes in such cities, towns, counties, local districts, special service districts, and school districts, acquire lands, buildings, and personal property therein for such use; and may equip, maintain, operate and supervise the same, employing such play leaders, recreation directors, supervisors and other employees as it may deem proper.  Such acquisition of lands, buildings and personal property and the equipping, maintaining, operating and supervision of the same shall be deemed to be for public, governmental and municipal purposes.

